Alaska, session 34, HB237.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section 05 to read: 06 LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the legislature that each student is 07 prepared for success in Algebra I or an equivalent class by taking 60 daily minutes or 300 08 weekly minutes of instruction in mathematics from grades kindergarten through eight and that 09 the student's parent or guardian is regularly informed of the student's progress. It is the intent 10 of the legislature that the instruction builds proficiency in mathematics by providing 11 evidence-based mathematics instruction using effective, standards-aligned instructional 12 materials, providing evidence-based mathematics intervention instruction, providing ongoing 13 support to mathematics educators, and automatically enrolling students in advanced 14 mathematics classes. 01 * Sec. 2. AS 14.30 is amended by adding new sections to read: 02 Article 17. Mathematics Education. 03 Sec. 14.30.850. Support for mathematics education. (a) To implement the 04 mathematics intervention instruction required under AS 14.30.855 and the advanced 05 mathematics class sequences offered under AS 14.30.860, the department shall 06 (1) make available to districts a list of instructional materials that are 07 aligned with the state content standards adopted in the subject of mathematics as 08 directed by AS 14.07.020(b)(1); the materials must be evaluated and selected based on 09 (A) how well the materials align with state content standards 10 and support building mathematical knowledge and skills; 11 (B) whether the materials support evidence-based instructional 12 practices that develop all aspects of mathematical proficiency; 13 (C) whether the materials are appropriate for intervention 14 instruction required under AS 14.30.855; 15 (2) make available to districts a list of at least one standards-based 16 mathematics assessment that may serve as a tool to monitor student progress in 17 mathematics; an assessment under this paragraph must 18 (A) include a standards-based screening assessment to be 19 administered within the first 30 days of a school term; 20 (B) include a diagnostic tool that allows a teacher to target 21 instruction based on the student's needs; 22 (C) measure the student's progress toward grade-level 23 mathematical proficiency; 24 (D) identify students who are likely to score below proficient 25 on a state standards-based mathematics assessment or other equivalent 26 measure, as determined by the department; 27 (3) create a credential for teachers who provide instruction in 28 mathematics to grades kindergarten through eight and who demonstrate competency in 29 evidence-based mathematics teaching practices relating to mathematics knowledge 30 and skills; the credential must be competency-based and recognize that the teacher has 31 mastered specific teaching practices and effectively uses the practices in the 01 classroom. 02 (b) To implement the mathematics intervention instruction required under 03 AS 14.30.855 and the advanced mathematics class sequences offered under 04 AS 14.30.860, a district shall 05 (1) assess all students for mathematical proficiency within the first 30 06 days of the school term using a standards-based assessment on the list made available 07 by the department under (a)(2) of this section; 08 (2) establish a program to support teachers who provide instruction in 09 mathematics; the program must include 10 (A) professional development that uses evidence-based 11 practices to support teachers and administrators on topics that include 12 developing mathematical proficiency, using data from the standards-based 13 assessments used by the district to build evidence-based teaching practices, and 14 providing mathematical intervention and advanced mathematics tracks to 15 students as appropriate; 16 (B) on-site teacher training in evidence-based mathematics 17 instruction and data-based decision-making that includes 18 (i) demonstrated lesson plans; 19 (ii) co-writing lesson plans; 20 (iii) teacher collaborations; and 21 (iv) co-teaching or teaching observations that include 22 immediate feedback for improving instruction; and 23 (3) adopt mathematics instructional materials included on the list made 24 available by the department under (a)(1) of this section, foster age-appropriate 25 perseverance in students, and include professional development resources that will 26 increase a teacher's knowledge of best-practices for using the materials. 27 Sec. 14.30.855. Mathematics intervention instruction. (a) A district shall 28 provide a mathematics improvement plan that offers intervention instruction in 29 mathematics to each student in grades kindergarten through eight who scores below 30 proficient on a standards-based mathematics assessment administered under 31 AS 14.30.850(b)(1) or an equivalent assessment, as determined by the department. 01 Instruction under this subsection must be for at least 30 minutes three times each week 02 or up to 60 hours a school year, according to the student's mathematics improvement 03 plan, and be in addition to the student's regular mathematics instruction. The 04 instruction may occur outside of regular school hours as necessary. The instruction 05 must 06 (1) use evidence-based practices, including clear explanations of 07 concepts, modeling strategies, and immediate feedback to a student; 08 (2) include targeted individual or small-group mathematics instruction 09 and activities; and 10 (3) continuously monitor the student's progress in mathematics and 11 provide data for teachers to adjust instruction according to the student's needs. 12 (b) The district shall implement a mathematics improvement plan required 13 under (a) of this section not later than 10 days after receiving a student's below- 14 proficient test score. The district shall create the plan in cooperation with the student's 15 mathematics teachers, the school principal, other applicable school personnel, and the 16 student's parent or guardian. The plan must include a description of the evidence- 17 based mathematics intervention instruction and activities in which the student will 18 participate. A plan must be in effect until the student demonstrates mathematical 19 proficiency in all skills in which the student did not previously achieve a score of 20 proficiency. A district shall provide monthly updates to the parent or guardian of a 21 student on the student's progress while in a plan. 22 (c) A district shall provide notice to a parent or guardian of a student in the 23 second semester of kindergarten through grade eight who requires a mathematics 24 improvement plan under (a) of this section. The notice must be written in a language 25 the parent or guardian understands and must include 26 (1) a statement that the student qualifies for a mathematics 27 improvement plan and mathematics intervention instruction offered under (a) of this 28 section, that a teacher, school principal, and other school personnel, as applicable, in 29 cooperation with the student's parent or guardian, will develop a mathematics 30 improvement plan for the student, and that the district will provide updates to the 31 parent or guardian on the student's progress at least once each month; 01 (2) a description of the mathematics intervention instruction that will 02 immediately be provided to the student; 03 (3) a description of the proposed, evidence-based mathematics 04 interventions, including supplemental instructional services and supports designed to 05 increase mathematical proficiency in the areas in need of mathematics intervention 06 instruction; and 07 (4) strategies the parent or guardian can use at home to help the student 08 succeed in mathematics. 09 Sec. 14.30.860. Advanced mathematics class sequences. (a) A district shall 10 develop a sequence of classes constituting an advanced mathematics track for grades 11 six through eight. The track must be designed to culminate in a student enrolling in 12 Algebra I or an integrated equivalent, as determined by the department, before grade 13 nine and to prepare the student for multiple types of mathematics classes for which the 14 student can earn college credit in grades nine through 12. 15 (b) A district shall develop a sequence of classes constituting an advanced 16 mathematics track for grades nine through 12. The track must be designed to result in 17 a student earning college credit in multiple mathematics classes in grades nine through 18 12. 19 (c) A school shall automatically enroll a student in grades six through 12 who 20 scores at or above proficient on a standards-based mathematics assessment 21 administered under AS 14.30.850(b)(1) or an equivalent assessment, as determined by 22 the department, in a class that is part of an advanced mathematics track under (a) of 23 this section appropriate to the student's level of mathematical proficiency, as 24 determined by the school. The parent or guardian of a student automatically enrolled 25 in an advanced mathematics track class may choose to withdraw the student from the 26 class. The parent or guardian of a student who does not qualify for placement into an 27 advanced mathematics track class may request that the school place the student into an 28 advanced mathematics track class and may appeal a denial to the district 29 superintendent or the superintendent's designee. 30 (d) A district shall provide to a student enrolled in an advanced mathematics 31 track class academic support for successful completion of the class, which may 01 include additional instruction outside of regular class hours, tutoring, small group 02 instruction, and technology-based activities. 03 (e) The district shall provide information to students and parents or guardians 04 of students on advanced mathematics enrollment in grades six through 12 developed 05 under this section, including information describing 06 (1) how enrollment in advanced mathematics affects the sequence of 07 mathematics classes a student takes; 08 (2) the purpose of automatically enrolling certain students in advanced 09 mathematics classes; and 10 (3) the different educational pathways in mathematics available to 11 students in the district and how those pathways prepare students for college and career 12 opportunities. 13 Sec. 14.30.865. Definitions. In AS 14.30.850 - 14.30.865, 14 (1) "district" has the meaning given in AS 14.17.990; 15 (2) "mathematical proficiency" means a combination of practical 16 problem-solving skills, the ability to perform mathematical operations with speed, 17 accuracy, efficiency, and flexibility, a conceptual understanding of mathematics, and 18 the ability to view mathematics as sensible and worthwhile that are appropriate to the 19 student's grade level as determined by the department. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.